Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.125

Parental notification of report alleging sexual misconduct or abuse—Notice of parental rights.

The department and an agency must, at the first opportunity but in all cases within forty-eight hours of receiving a report alleging sexual misconduct or abuse by an agency employee, notify the parents or guardian of a child alleged to be the victim, target, or recipient of the misconduct or abuse. The department and an agency shall provide parents annually with information regarding their rights under the public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW, to request the public records regarding the employee.

[ 2007 c 415 s 8. Formerly RCW 43.215.120.]